District of Columbia statutes.
50-383.02

Duties of the task force. [Expired.]

Expired.

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6043, 54 DCR 7052

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6043 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Emergency Legislation

Section 6046 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that this subchapter shall expire on October 1, 2008.

Editor's Notes